Washington statutes.
RCW 1.50.006

Findings—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds that eighty-four people died waiting for an organ transplant in Washington state in 2013. The legislature further finds that more than two thousand six hundred people are currently waiting for a lifesaving organ transplant in Washington state. Forty of those patients waiting are under the age of eighteen and more than two hundred of those patients have been waiting for more than five years for their lifesaving gift. The legislature further finds that organ donation is a very rare and precious gift. Less than one percent of all people who die are eligible to donate their organs due to the unique circumstances needed at death to donate organs. Every donor is a critical donation to those waiting.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to update the gift of life award to recognize all Washington citizens who have donated critical lifesaving organs.

[ 2015 c 8 s 1.]